Hawaii, session 2025, SB624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature recognizes that Prince Jonah Kuhio Kalanianaole led efforts to convince the United States Congress to pass the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act of 1920, as amended, under which the department of Hawaiian home lands was created.  The legislature finds that requiring certain public buildings near mass transit projects and on Hawaiian home lands to display portraits of Prince Kuhio is an appropriate way to honor the prince's legacy as the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act's author. The purpose of this Act is to require certain public buildings near mass transit projects and on Hawaiian home lands to display portraits of Prince Jonah Kuhio Kalanianaole. SECTION 2.  Chapter 27, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§27-     Prince Kuhio; portraits; buildings.  Any public building or structure that is located: (1)  Within     feet of a mass transit project that receives moneys from a surcharge on state tax established pursuant to section 46-16.8; and (2)  On Hawaiian home lands, shall display a portrait of Prince Jonah Kuhio Kalanianaole." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________